Massachusetts, session 194th, S2291.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 94A of chapter 164 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official
Edition, is hereby amended by inserting after the final paragraph the following new paragraph:-
Notwithstanding anything set forth herein, the department shall not approve any contract
for the purchase of gas, gas pipeline capacity or liquefied gas storage where any contract costs
would be recoverable from the ratepayers, if such contract requires any construction or
expansion of interstate gas infrastructure.
of 1